Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-811
Sections; supplementary to existing law.

Sections 16-801 to 16-811 are supplementary to existing statutes relating to cities of the first class and confer upon such cities powers not heretofore granted.

Laws 1955, c. 35, § 11, p. 147.